Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2314
Corporation; dissolution; effect.

Whenever the board of directors by resolution determines that the purposes for which the corporation was formed have been substantially complied with and all bonds issued and all obligations incurred by the corporation have been fully paid, the board of directors shall execute and file for record in the office of the Secretary of State a certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the corporation dissolved. A certificate of dissolution shall be executed under the corporate seal of the corporation. Upon the filing of the certificate of dissolution, the corporation shall stand dissolved and the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of dissolution shall vest in the local political subdivision. Possession of the funds and properties shall be delivered to the local political subdivision.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 14.